Massachusetts, session 194th, S1518.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby 
amended by inserting after section 8C the following section:-   
Section 8D. The annual Consumer Confidence Report on water quality shall include the 
following language whenever the fluoride in drinking water is at or above 0.3 ppm:  
The offspring of pregnant persons and bottle-fed babies are at risk of developmental 
neurotoxicity and damaged teeth from fluoride levels at or above 0.3 ppm;  
Diabetics and those with kidney, thyroid, or inflammatory conditions are at risk of 
worsening their conditions from consumption of waters at or above 0.3 ppm.